smi/src/fst/stems/smi-digits.lexc
LEXICON datetag
 +Num+Sem/Date:  dateyearcase ;


LEXICON dateyearcase_nullsuff_w_dot_tag
 +Num+Sem/Date:  dateyearcase_nullsuff_w_dot ;

LEXICON dateyearcase_fullsuff_tag
 +Num+Sem/Date:  dateyearcase_fullsuff ;


LEXICON numclock
 +Num+Sem/Time-clock: dateyearcase ; !foreløpig

LEXICON numclockx
 +Num+Sem/Time-clock+Use/NG: dateyearcase ;  


!LEXICON ARABICCASEphone  
! +Num+Sem/Phonenr+Sg+Nom: # ;
! +Num+Sem/Phonenr+Sg+Acc: # ;



LEXICON NUM-ARABICCASES
+Num:   ARABICCASES ;

LEXICON ID-ARABIC
+Num+Sem/ID:   # ;
+Num+Sem/ID:%:  DIGITCASE ; ! This is the 1984:s case.


LEXICON ARABICLOOPORD   !!≈ * __@CODE@__ ordinals
             +A+Arab+Ord+Attr:   MARKDOT            ; ! 16. as attr
!           +A+Arab+Ord+Sg+Nom:   MARKDOT            ; ! 16. as pred
! +Num+Arab+Sg+Nom#%.%<sent%>:%. #                  ; !for Apertium bz. 22
         +A+Arab+Ord+Use/Circ:   ARABICDELIMITERORD ;

LEXICON ACASETAG   !!≈ * __@CODE@__  is for 1e+Num+Sg+Num:1e
+Num: ARABICCASE0 ;
+Num:%: ARABICCASE ;

LEXICON ARABICLOOPCOLL   !!≈ * __@CODE@__ collectives
 +N+Coll+Arab+Use/Circ: ARABICDELIMITERCOLL ;


LEXICON ARABICDELIMITER   !!≈ * __@CODE@__  blank + 3 delim, what does the lg counc prefer?
 +Num:            ARABICCASE0      ; ! This is the 1984 case, ie NGA
 +Num:%:          ARABICCASE       ; ! This is the 1984:s case.
 +Num+Err/Orth:   ARABICCASE       ; ! This is the 1984s case.
 +Num+Err/Orth:'  ARABICCASE       ; ! This is the 1984's case.
 +Num+Err/Orth:’  ARABICCASE       ; ! optio-B07 = ’
 +Num+Err/Orth:∑- ARABICCASE       ; ! This is the 1984-s case.
 +Num+Err/Orth:´  ARABICCASE       ; ! This is the 1984´s case.
 +Num:            ARABICCOMPOUNDS  ; ! 6-jáhkasaš, 
 +Use/GC:         MEASUREMENTS     ;

LEXICON ARABICDELIMITERORD   !!≈ * __@CODE@__ ordinals
!               ARABICCASE0       ; ! This is the 1984 case, ie NGA
           :%:  ARABICCASEORD     ; ! This is the 16:dis case.
  +Err/Orth:.%: ARABICCASEORD     ; ! This is the 16.:dis case.
  +Err/Orth:    ARABICCASEORD     ; ! This is the 16dis case.
  +Err/Orth:'   ARABICCASEORD     ; ! This is the 16'dis case.
  +Err/Orth:∑-  ARABICCASEORD     ; ! This is the 16-dis case.
  +Err/Orth:.%: ARABICCASEORD-ERR ; ! This is the 16.:is case.

LEXICON ARABICDELIMITERCOLL   !!≈ * __@CODE@__ collectives
!             ARABICCASE0    ; ! This is the 1984 case, ie NGA
          :%: ARABICCASECOLL ; ! This is the 1984:s case.
 +Err/Orth:   ARABICCASECOLL ; ! This is the 1984s case.
 +Err/Orth:'  ARABICCASECOLL ; ! This is the 1984's case.
 +Err/Orth:∑- ARABICCASECOLL ; ! This is the 1984-s case.

LEXICON PROSENT !!≈ * __@CODE@__ % and case suffix
                    POSTPROSENT ; ! case suffix
 % %%+Err/MissingSpace:%%   POSTPROSENT ; ! 50%. It is wrong, but 75 % of us write "75%".
          % %%:% %% POSTPROSENT ; ! the correct ones as well... 50 % etc.
 % %%+Err/MissingSpace:%%   POSTPROSENT ; ! 50%. It is wrong, but 75 % of us write "75%".

LEXICON POSTPROSENT !!≈ * __@CODE@__ % and case suffix
< "@R.ErrOrth.ON@" "+Err/Orth":0 "@C.ErrOrth@" > ARABICDELIMITER ;
   @D.ErrOrth.ON@@C.ErrOrth@                     ARABICDELIMITER ;

LEXICON MEASUREMENTS
 <{ km}>      MEASUREMENTS-tags ;
 < { m}>      MEASUREMENTS-tags ;
 <{ dm}>      MEASUREMENTS-tags ;
 <{ cm}>      MEASUREMENTS-tags ;
 <{ mm}>      MEASUREMENTS-tags ;
 < " ": {km}> MEASUREMENTS-errtags ;
 < " ":  {m}> MEASUREMENTS-errtags ;
 < " ": {dm}> MEASUREMENTS-errtags ;
 < " ": {cm}> MEASUREMENTS-errtags ;
 < " ": {mm}> MEASUREMENTS-errtags ;

LEXICON MEASUREMENTS-tags
 +N+Sem/Measr:   # ; ! 50 m. 

LEXICON MEASUREMENTS-errtags
 +N+Err/Orth+Sem/Measr:    # ; ! 50m. 

LEXICON ROMNUMTAG   !!≈ * __@CODE@__
  +Num+Rom+Sg+Nom+Use/Circ:   #            ;
!     +Num+Sg+Gen+Use/Circ:   #            ;
!     +Num+Sg+Acc+Use/Circ:   #            ;
!    +A+Rom+Ord+Attr+Use/Circ:%. #            ; ! !III. as ordinal.
!    +Num+Rom+Sem/ID+Use/Circ:%.  #            ; ! ! Denne lager problemer for ii. og er vel egentlig ikke riktig?
             +Num+Use/Circ:%: ROMNUMTAGOBL ;
    +Num+Use/Circ+Err/Orth:'  ROMNUMTAGOBL ;
    +Num+Use/Circ+Err/Orth:∑- ROMNUMTAGOBL ;
    +Num+Use/Circ+Err/Orth:%´ ROMNUMTAGOBL ;
!                     +Num:   ROMNUMTAGOBL ;



LEXICON yeartag
 +Num+Sem/Year: dateyearcase ;

LEXICON NUMTAG
+Num+Arab:  # ;
